Washington statutes.
RCW 36.68.600

Use of park and recreation service area funds in exercise of powers enumerated in chapter 67.20 RCW.

A park and recreation service area may exercise any of the powers enumerated in chapter 67.20 RCW with respect to any park and recreation facility financed in whole or part from park and recreation service area funds.

[ 1988 c 82 s 6; 1981 c 210 s 17; 1963 c 218 s 21.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 210: See note following RCW 36.68.400.

Parks, bathing beaches, public camps: Chapter 67.20 RCW.